lt-LT: Siūlės konstrukcija: Siūta rankomis; Siūta mašina; Formuota; Besiūlė; Kita
el: Κατασκευή ραφών: Ραμμένο στο χέρι; Ραμμένο σε μηχανή; Χυτευμένο; Χωρίς ραφές; Άλλο
da: Sømkonstruktion: Håndsyet; Maskinsyet; Støbt; Sømløs; Andet
hr-HR: Izrada šavova: Ručno šivano; Strojno šivano; Oblikovano u kalupu; Bez šavova; Ostalo
fi: Sauman rakenne: Käsin ommeltu; Koneella ommeltu; Valettu; Saumaton; Muu
pt-BR: Costura construção: Costurado à mão; Costurado à máquina; Moldado; Sem costura; Outros
ko: 이음매 구조: 핸드 스티치; 머신 스티치; 몰딩 처리; 무봉제; 기타
nb: Sømkonstruksjon: Håndsydd; Maskinsydd; Støpt; Sømløs; Annet
ja: シーム構造: 手縫い; 機械縫い; 成型; シームレス; その他
th: การเย็บตะเข็บ: เย็บด้วยมือ; เย็บด้วยเครื่องจักร; หล่อขึ้นรูป; ไร้รอยตะเข็บ; อื่นๆ
cs: Konstrukce švů: Ručně šité; Strojově šité; Lisované; Bezešvé; Jiné
sl-SI: Zgradba šivov: Ročno šivano; Strojno šivano; Oblikovano; Brezšivno; Drugo
nl: Naadconstructie: Handgestikt; Machinegestikt; Gegoten; Naadloos; Overig
es: Confección de costuras: Cosido a mano; Cosido a máquina; Moldeado; Sin costuras; Otro
sv: Sömkonstruktion: Handsydd; Maskinsydd; Gjuten; Sömlös; Övrigt
tr: Dikiş yapısı: Elde dikilmiş; Makinede dikilmiş; Kalıplı; Dikişsiz; Diğer
ru: Конструкция шва: Ручной шов; Машинный шов; Формованный; Бесшовный; Другое
hu: Varrat kialakítása: Kézzel varrott; Géppel varrott; Formázott; Varrat nélküli; Egyéb
vi: Cấu trúc đường may: Khâu tay; Khâu máy; Đúc; Không đường may; Khác
fr: Construction de la couture: Cousu main; Cousu à la machine; Moulé; Sans couture; Autre
sk-SK: Spracovanie švu: Ručne prešívané; Strojovo prešívané; Tvarované; Bezšvové; Iné
pt-PT: Construção da costura: Cosido à mão; Cosido à máquina; Moldado; Sem costuras; Outro
en: Seam construction: Hand-stitched; Machine-stitched; Molded; Seamless; Other
de: Nahtkonstruktion: Handgenäht; Maschinengenäht; Geformt; Nahtlos; Sonstige
zh-TW: 接縫結構: 手工縫製; 機器縫製; 成型; 無縫; 其他
bg-BG: Конструкция на шевове: Ръчно шити; Машинно шити; Отлети; Безшевни; Други
it: Realizzazione della cucitura: Cucito a mano; Cucito a macchina; Stampato; Senza cuciture; Altro
ro-RO: Construcția cusăturii: Cusut manual; Cusut la mașină; Turnat; Fără cusături; Altele
pl: Konstrukcja szwu: Szyte ręcznie; Szyte maszynowo; Formowane; Bezszwowe; Inne
zh-CN: 接缝结构: 手工缝制; 机器缝制; 模制; 无缝; 其他